tables/fr-bfu-g2.ctb
word dignitaire		145-2356-2345-1235
word dignitaires	145-2356-2345-1235-234
prfword dignité		145-2356-2345
prfword dignités		145-2356-2345-234
word discours		256-14
contraction disc 145-24-324-14
word dispositif		256-1234-124
word dispositifs	256-1234-124-234
prfword disposition	256-1234
prfword dispositions	256-1234-234
word distance		256-2345-14
word distances		256-2345-14-234
word distant		256-2345
word distants		256-2345-234
word distante		256-2345-15
word distantes		256-2345-156
word donc		145-14
word dont		145-2345
contraction dt 145-2345
word douleur		145-123
word douleurs		145-123-234
word douloureuse	145-123-234-15
word douloureuses	145-123-234-156
word douloureusement	145-123-234-134
word douloureux		145-123-1346
word doute		145-1256
word doutes		145-1256-234
word duquel		145-136-12345-123
prfword effectif		15-124-124
prfword effectifs		15-124-124-234
prfword effective		15-124-1236
prfword effectives		15-124-1236-234
word effectivement	15-124-1236-134
word effet		15-124
word effets		15-124-234
word égal		123456-1245
word égale		123456-1245-15
word égales		123456-1245-156
word également		123456-1245-134
word égalitaire		123456-1245-2345-1235
word égalitaires	123456-1245-2345-1235-234
word égalité		123456-1245-2345
word égalités		123456-1245-2345-234
word égaux		123456-1245-1346
word élément		123456-123
word éléments		123456-123-234
word élémentaire	123456-123-1235
word élémentaires	123456-123-1235-234
word encore		26-14
word endroit		26-145
word endroits		26-145-234
word end 15-1345-145
word ends 15-1345-145-234
word énergie		123456-1345
word énergies		123456-1345-234
word énergique		123456-1345-12345
word énergiques		123456-1345-12345-234
word énergiquement	123456-1345-12345-134
word enfin		26-124
word ennui		26-1345
word ennuis		26-1345-234
word ennuyeuse		26-1345-234-15
word ennuyeuses		26-1345-234-156
word ennuyeux		26-1345-1346
word enquête		26-12345
word enquêtes		26-12345-234
word enquêteur		26-12345-46
word enquêteurs		26-12345-46-234
word enquêteuse		26-12345-234-15
word enquêteuses	26-12345-234-156
word ensemble		26-345
word ensembles		26-345-234
word ensuite		26-234
word ens 56-15-1345-234
word entier		26-2345
word entiers		26-2345-234
word entière		26-1235
word entières		26-1235-234
word entièrement	26-1235-134
word environ		26-1236
word environs		26-1236-234
word espèce		156-1234
word espèces		156-1234-234
prfword espérance		156-1235-14
prfword espérances		156-1235-14-234
noback prfword espoir		156-1235
noback prfword espoirs		156-1235-234
nofor word espoir 156-1235
nofor word espoirs 156-1235-234
word désespoir 145-123456-234-156-1235
word désespoirs  145-123456-234-156-1235-234
word esprit		15-235
word esprits		15-235-234
word essentiel		156-123
word essentiels		156-123-234
word essentielle	156-123-123
word essentielles	156-123-123-234
word essentiellement	156-123-134
word étant		123456-2345
word être		126-356
word êtres		126-356-234
word événement		123456-1236
word événements		123456-1236-234
word éventualité	123456-1236-123-2345
word éventualités	123456-1236-123-2345-234
word éventuel		123456-1236-123
word éventuels		123456-1236-123-234
word éventuelle		123456-1236-123-123
word éventuelles	123456-1236-123-123-234
word éventuellement	123456-1236-123-134
word excellemment	1346-123-134
word excellence		1346-123-14
word excellences	1346-123-14-234
word excellent		1346-123
word excellents		1346-123-234
word excellente		1346-123-15
word excellentes	1346-123-156
word excès		1346-14
word excessif		1346-14-124
word excessifs		1346-14-124-234
word excessive		1346-14-1236
word excessives		1346-14-1236-234
word excessivement	1346-14-1236-134
word exercice		1346-236
word exercices		1346-236-234
prfword expérience		1346-1234
prfword expériences	1346-1234-234
contraction xp	1346-1234
word exp 56-15-1346-1234
word expérimental	1346-1234-123
word expérimentale	1346-1234-123-15
word expérimentales	1346-1234-123-156
word expérimentalement	1346-1234-123-134
word expérimentateur	1346-1234-46
word expérimentateurs	1346-1234-46-234
word expérimentation	1346-1234-16
word expérimentations	1346-1234-16-234
word expérimentaux	1346-1234-1346
prfword explicable		1346-1246-45
prfword explicables	1346-1246-45-234
word explicatif		1346-1246-124
word explicatifs	1346-1246-124-234
word explication	1346-1246
word explications	1346-1246-234
word explicative	1346-1246-1236
word explicatives	1346-1246-1236-234
prfword expressif		1346-235-124
prfword expressifs		1346-235-124-234
word expression		1346-235
word expressions	1346-235-234
prfword expressive		1346-235-1236
prfword expressives	1346-235-1236-234
prfword expressivement	1346-235-1236-134
prfword expressivité	1346-235-1236-2345
prfword expressivités	1346-235-1236-2345-234
word extérieur		1346-2345
word extérieurs		1346-2345-234
word extérieure		1346-2345-15
word extérieures	1346-2345-156
word extérieurement	1346-2345-134
word extraordinaire 1346-356-1-56-145
word extraordinaires 1346-356-1-56-145-234
word extraordinairement 1346-356-1-56-145-134
word extrême		1346-356
word extrêmes		1346-356-234
word extrêmement	1346-356-134
word extrémité		1346-356-2345
word extrémités		1346-356-2345-234

word facile		124-14
word faciles		124-14-234
word facilement		124-14-134
word facilité		124-14-2345
word facilités		124-14-2345-234
word faubourg		124-12
word faubourgs		124-12-234
word faut		124-2345
word faute		124-2345-15
word fautes		124-2345-15-234
word fautif		124-2345-124
word fautifs		124-2345-124-234
word fautive		124-2345-1236
word fautives		124-2345-1236-234
prfword faveur		124-1236
prfword faveurs		124-1236-234
prfword favorable		124-1236-45
prfword favorables		124-1236-45-234
prfword favorablement	124-1236-45-134
word féminin		124-134-35
word féminins		124-134-35-234
word féminine		124-134-1345
word féminines		124-134-1345-234
word féminité	124-134-1345-2345
word féminités	124-134-1345-2345-234
word femme		124-134
contraction fm 124-134
word femmes		124-134-234
word fête		124-126
word fêtes		124-126-234
prfword fidèle		124-145
prfword fidèles		124-145-234
prfword fidèlement		124-145-134
prfword fidélité		124-145-2345
prfword fidélités		124-145-2345-234
prfword figuratif		124-1245-124
prfword figuratifs		124-1245-124-234
prfword figuration		124-1245-16
prfword figurations	124-1245-16-234
prfword figurative		124-1245-1236
prfword figuratives	124-1245-1236-234
word fg 56-124-1245
prfword figure		124-1245
prfword figures		124-1245-234
word fille		124-123
word filles		124-123-234
word fils		124-234
word fonction		124-346
word fonctions		124-346-234
word fonctionnaire	124-346-1235
word fonctionnaires	124-346-1235-234
word fonctionnel	124-346-123
word fonctionnels	124-346-123-234
word fonctionnelle	124-346-123-123
word fonctionnelles	124-346-123-123-234
word fonctionnellement	124-346-123-134-134
prfword fonctionnement	124-346-134
prfword fonctionnements	124-346-134-234
noback prfword force		124-135
noback prfword forces		124-135-234
nofor word force 124-135
nofor word forces 124-135-234
nofor word antiforce 2-2345-24-124-135
nofor word antiforces 2-2345-24-124-135-234
nofor word bioforce 12-24-135-124-135
nofor word bioforces 12-24-135-124-135-234
nofor word efforce 15-124-124-135
nofor word efforces 15-124-124-135-234
nofor word renforce 1235-26-124-135
nofor word renforces 1235-26-124-135-234
word fo 56-124-135
word forcément		124-135-134
prfword fortune		124-1345
contraction fn	124-1345
prfword fortunes		124-1345-234
prfword fraternel		124-1235-123
prfword fraternels		124-1235-123-234
prfword fraternelle	124-1235-123-123
prfword fraternelles	124-1235-123-123-234
prfword fraternellement	124-1235-123-134
prfword fraternisation	124-1235-16
prfword fraternisations	124-1235-16-234
prfword fraternité		124-1235-2345
prfword fraternités	124-1235-2345-234
word fréquemment	124-12345-134
prfword fréquence		124-12345-14
prfword fréquences		124-12345-14-234
word fréquent		124-12345
word fréquents		124-12345-234
word fréquente		124-12345-15
word fréquentes		124-12345-156
word fréquentation	124-12345-16
word fréquentations	124-12345-16-234
prfword frère		124-1235
prfword frères		124-1235-234
word fr 56-124-1235
word ifr 56-24-124-1235
word sfr 56-234-124-1235

prfword garde		1245-145
prfword gardes		1245-145-234
word gd 56-1245-145
word général		1245-1345
word générale		1245-1345-15
word générales		1245-1345-156
word généralement	1245-1345-134
word généralisation	1245-1345-16
word généralisations	1245-1345-16-234
word généralité		1245-1345-2345
word généralités	1245-1345-2345-234
word généraux		1245-1345-1346
word généreuse		1245-234-15
word généreuses		1245-234-156
word généreusement	1245-234-134
contraction gsm 1245-234-134
word généreux		1245-1346
word générosité		1245-234-2345
word générosités	1245-234-2345-234
word gloire		1245-1235
word gloires		1245-1235-234
word gr 56-1245-1235
word glorieuse		1245-1235-234-15
word glorieuses		1245-1235-234-156
word glorieusement	1245-1235-234-134
word glorieux		1245-1235-1346
word gouvernement	1245-1236
word gouvernements	1245-1236-234
word gouvernemental	1245-1236-123
word gouvernementale	1245-1236-123-15
word gouvernementales	1245-1236-123-156
word gouvernementaux	1245-1236-1346
word gouverneur		1245-1236-46
word gouverneurs	1245-1236-46-234
prfword grâce		12456-14
prfword grâces		12456-14-234
prfword gracieuse		12456-14-234-15
prfword gracieuses		12456-14-234-156
prfword gracieusement	12456-14-234-134
prfword gracieux		12456-14-1346
word grande		12456-145
word grandes		12456-145-234
word grandement		12456-145-134
word grandeur		12456-46
word grandeurs		12456-46-234
word grave		12456-1236
word graves		12456-1236-234
word gravement		12456-1236-134
word gravitation	12456-1236-2345-16
word gravitations	12456-1236-2345-16-234
word gravité		12456-1236-2345
word gravités		12456-1236-2345-234
word groupe		12456-1234
word groupes		12456-1234-234
prfword groupement		12456-1234-134
prfword groupements	12456-1234-134-234
word guère		1245-2346
word guerre		1245-236
word guerres		1245-236-234

word habitude		125-12
word habitudes		125-12-234
word hbs 56-125-12-234
prfword habituel		125-12-123
prfword habituels		125-12-123-234
prfword habituelle		125-12-123-123
prfword habituelles	125-12-123-123-234
prfword habituellement	125-12-123-134
word hasard		125-145
contraction hd 125-145
word hasards		125-145-234
word hasardeuse		125-145-234-15
word hasardeuses	125-145-234-156
word hasardeux		125-145-1346
word hélas		125-123
word heure		125-1235
word heures		125-1235-234
word heureuse		125-234-15
word heureuses		125-234-156
word heureusement	125-234-134
word heureux		125-1346
word hier		125-236
word histoire		125-2345
word histoires		125-2345-234
contraction ht
word préhistoire 235-123456-125-2345
word préhistoires 235-123456-125-2345-234
prfword historique		125-2345-12345
prfword historiques	125-2345-12345-234
prfword historiquement	125-2345-12345-134
word hiver		125-1236
word hivers		125-1236-234
word hivernal		125-1236-123
word hivernale		125-1236-123-15
word hivernales		125-1236-123-156
word hivernaux		125-1236-1346
word hommage		125-1245
word hommages		125-1245-234
contraction hg 125-1245
word homme		125-134
word hommes		125-134-234
noback prfword honnête		125-126
nofor word honnête 125-126
nofor word déshonnête 145-123456-234-125-126
nofor word malhonnête 134-1-123-125-126
prfword honnêtes		125-126-234
prfword honnêtement	125-126-134
prfword honnêteté		125-126-2345
prfword honnêtetés		125-126-2345-234
noback prfword honneur		125-1345
noback prfword honneurs		125-1345-234
nofor word honneur 125-1345
nofor word honneurs 125-1345-234
nofor word déshonneur 145-123456-234-125-1345
nofor word déshonneurs 145-123456-234-125-1345-234
